Utah statutes.
59-22-303.   Allocable share.

(1)  "Allocable Share," which is referenced in Subsection 59-22-202(3), is defined in the Master Settlement Agreement as follows:

"Allocable Share" means the percentage set forth for the State in question as listed in Exhibit A hereto, without regard to any subsequent alteration or modification of such State's percentage share agreed to or by or among any States; or, solely for the purpose of calculating payments under subsection IX(c)(2) (and corresponding payments under subsection IX(i)), the percentage disclosed for the State in question pursuant to subsection IX(c)(2)(A) prior to June 30, 1999, without regard to any subsequent alteration or modification of such State's percentage share agreed to by or among any States.

(2)  The percentage set forth for Utah in Exhibit A to the Master Settlement Agreement is 0.4448869%.

(3)  The percentage for calculating "Strategic Contribution Payments" to Utah under subsection IX(c)(2) is to be determined by a three-member Allocation Committee in accordance with Exhibit U of the Master Settlement Agreement.

